Utah statutes.
17-27a-303.   Entrance upon land.

A county may enter upon any land at reasonable times to make examinations and surveys pertinent to the:

(1)  preparation of its general plan; or

(2)  preparation or enforcement of its land use ordinances.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 254, 2005 General Session

